Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2387.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Title 15, chapter 5, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 15-502.01, to read: START_STATUTE15-502.01. Secondary employment; school district officials; prohibition; legal actions; definitions A. Notwithstanding sections 15-502 and 15-503, the governing board of a school district with a student count of more than five hundred may not employ any individual as a school district official while the individual engages in secondary employment. B. The following persons may bring an action in a court of competent jurisdiction to enjoin any violation of this section by a school district governing board: 1. A student's parent or a student who is at least eighteen years of age, if the student is enrolled at a school in the school district. 2. A person who resides in the geographic boundaries of the school district. 3. Any other person who has an interest that is or may be adversely affected. C. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Official": (a) Means an individual who meets any of the following: (i) Is responsible for procurement activities of the school district. (ii) Is responsible for the direction, control and operation of the school district or school district offices. (iii) Has control or decision-making authority over the school district's budget. (b) Includes a superintendent and chief financial officer. 2. "Secondary employment": (a) Means any work, service or business activity for which an individual receives monetary or other compensation as an employee, contractor, business owner or business partner. (b) Does not include either: (i) The discharge of an individual's duties as an official for the school district. (ii) The discharge of an individual's duties as an official for more than one school only if the school district employs the individual jointly with the other school district pursuant to section 15-503. (iii) Passive investment activity. 3. "Superintendent" includes a superintendent, deputy superintendent, assistant superintendent and associate superintendent. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-503, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-503. Superintendents, principals, head teachers and school psychologists; terms of employment; evaluation; contract delivery and acceptance; nonretention notice A. The A school district governing board may: 1. Employ a superintendent or principal, or both. If the governing board employs a superintendent, the governing board shall determine the qualifications for the superintendent by action taken at a public meeting.  The governing board shall require a superintendent to have a valid fingerprint clearance card that is issued pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 3.1. 2. Appoint a head teacher. 3. Jointly with another governing board employ a superintendent or a principal, or both, only if the student count of at least one of the school districts is not more than five hundred on the date that the governing boards execute or extend the superintendent's employment contract. If the governing board jointly employs a superintendent, the governing boards shall jointly determine the qualifications for the superintendent by action taken at a public meeting.  The governing boards shall require a superintendent to have a valid fingerprint clearance card that is issued pursuant to title 41, chapter 12, article 3.1. B. The term of employment of superintendents may be for any period not exceeding three years, except that if the superintendent's contract with the school district is for multiple years pursuant to this subsection, the school district shall not offer to extend or renegotiate the contract until no earlier than fifteen months before the expiration of the contract expires.  The term of employment of principals may be for any period not exceeding three years, except that if the principal's contract with the school district is for multiple years, the school district shall not offer to extend or negotiate the contract until May of the year preceding the final year of the contract.  The school district governing board or the governing body of the charter school shall communicate the superintendent's or principal's duties with respect to the classroom site fund established by section 15-977. C. The governing board shall establish systems for the evaluation of the performance of principals and other school administrators and certificated school psychologists in the school district. In the development developing and adoption of adopting these performance evaluation systems, the governing board shall avail itself of the advice of its administrators and certificated school psychologists. Each evaluation shall include recommendations as to areas of improvement in the performance of the certificated school psychologist if the performance of the certificated school psychologist warrants improvement. After transmittal of an assessment, a governing board designee shall confer with the certificated school psychologist to make specific recommendations as to areas of improvement in the certificated school psychologist's performance. The governing board designee shall provide assistance and opportunities for the certificated school psychologist to improve performance and shall follow up with the certificated school psychologist after a reasonable period of time for the purpose of ascertaining that the certificated school psychologist is demonstrating adequate performance. The evaluation process for certificated school psychologists shall include appeal procedures for certificated school psychologists who disagree with the evaluation of their performance, if the evaluation is for use as criteria for establishing compensation or dismissal. D. On or before May 15 each year, the governing board shall offer a contract for the next school year to each certified administrator and certificated school psychologist who is in the last year of the person's contract unless, on or before April 15, the governing board, a member of the board acting on behalf of the governing board or the superintendent of the school district gives notice to the administrator or certificated school psychologist of the governing board's intention not to offer a new contract.  If the governing board has called for an override election for the third Tuesday in May as provided in section 15-481, the governing board shall offer a contract for the next school year to each certified administrator or certificated school psychologist who is in the last year of the person's contract on or before June 15 unless, no not later than five days after the override election excluding Saturday, Sunday and legal holidays, the governing board, a member of the governing board acting on behalf of the governing board or the superintendent of the school district gives notice to the administrator or the certificated school psychologist of the governing board's intention not to offer a new contract. The administrator's or the certificated school psychologist's acceptance of the contract shall be indicated within thirty days after the date of the written contract or the offer is revoked. The administrator or certificated school psychologist accepts the contract by signing the contract and returning it to the governing board or by making a written instrument that accepts the terms of the contract and delivering the written instrument to the governing board. E. Notice of the governing board's intention not to reemploy the administrator or certificated school psychologist shall be made by delivering the notice personally to the administrator or the certificated school psychologist or by sending the notice by certified mail, postmarked on or before the applicable deadline prescribed in subsection D of this section, and directed to the administrator or the certificated school psychologist at the person's place of residence as recorded in the school district records. F. The governing board shall make available the evaluation and performance classification of each principal in the school district to school districts and charter schools that are inquiring about the performance of the principal for hiring purposes. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 38-503, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE38-503. Conflict of interest; exemptions; employment prohibitions A. Any public officer or employee of a public agency who has, or whose relative has, a substantial interest in any contract, sale, purchase or service to such the public agency shall make known that substantial interest in the official records of such the public agency and shall refrain from voting upon on or otherwise participating in any manner as an officer or employee in such the contract, sale or purchase. B. Any public officer or employee who has, or whose relative has, a substantial interest in any decision of a public agency shall make known such that substantial interest in the official records of such the public agency and shall refrain from participating in any manner as an officer or employee in such the decision. C. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsections A and B of this section, no a public officer or employee of a public agency shall not supply to such the public agency any equipment, material, supplies or services, unless pursuant to an award or contract let after public competitive bidding, except that: 1. A school district governing board may purchase, as provided in sections 15-213 and 15-323, supplies, materials and equipment from a school board member. 2. Political subdivisions other than school districts may purchase through their governing bodies, without using public competitive bidding procedures, supplies, materials and equipment not exceeding three hundred dollars of not more than $300 in cost in any single transaction, not to exceed a total of one thousand dollars $1,000 annually, from a member of the governing body if the policy for such purchases is approved annually. D. Notwithstanding subsections A and B of this section: and 1. As provided in sections 15-421 and 15-1441, the governing board of a school district or a community college district may not employ a person who is a member of the governing board or who is the spouse of a member of the governing board. 2. As provided in section 15-502.01, the governing board of a school district with a student count of more than five hundred may not employ a person as a school district official while the person engages in secondary employment as defined in section 15-502.01. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Existing contracts; applicability Section 15-502.01, Arizona Revised Statutes, as added by this act, and sections 15-503 and 38-503, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, apply to employment contracts that are executed, amended or renewed after the effective date of this act.